Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 63.30.530 and 2022 c 225 s 903 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person claiming to be the owner of property held under this chapter by the administrator may file a claim for the property on a form prescribed by the administrator. The claimant must verify the claim as to its completeness and accuracy.(2) The administrator may waive the requirement in subsection (1) of this section and may pay or deliver property directly to a person if:(a) The person receiving the property or payment is shown to be the apparent owner included on a report filed under RCW 63.30.220; and(b) The administrator reasonably believes the person is entitled to receive the property or payment.(3) The administrator may waive the requirement in subsection (1) of this section and may pay or deliver property directly to a person if:(a) The administrator determines that the apparent owner is a local government; and(b) The administrator reasonably believes the local government is entitled to receive the property or payment.(4) If the administrator determines that the apparent owner is a local government and potentially eligible for waiver under subsection (3) of this section, the administrator must annually notify the appropriate local government of the existence of such property identified by the administrator, including a description of the property, the value of the property, and any associated conditions or restrictions.(5) The administrator may request additional documentation from a local government to establish that the local government is entitled to the property.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---